District of Columbia statutes.
25-114

Arena C/X license requirements and qualifications; special provisions for on-premises retail licenses, class C, at DC Arena.

(a)

A retailer’s license, class Arena C/X, shall be issued only for the DC Arena and shall permit the storage and sale of spirits, wine, and beer for consumption on the premises of the DC Arena. The license shall not permit the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages in unbroken packages for the purpose of permitting the packages to be carried off the premises.

(b)

(1)

Upon application by an applicant as set forth in Chapter 4 [of this title], the Board shall issue one or more retailer’s licenses, class Arena C/X, to the lessee under the Land Disposition Lease.

(2)

At the option of the lessee, the licenses may be issued to concessionaires and tenants of the lessee, as may be requested from time to time by the lessee.

(3)

Licenses may be canceled by the Board at the request of the RLA if the lessee ceases to operate the DC Arena.

(4)

If the lessee assigns its interest in the Land Disposition Lease, the Board shall, at the request of the RLA, transfer the licenses to the lessee’s assignee, upon application under Chapter 4 and approval by the Board.

(c)

[Not funded].

(d)

One or more retailer’s licenses, class Arena C/X, shall be issued either as the license for all alcoholic beverage operations at the DC Arena or individually for concession stands, portable bars, and other non-fixed locations, and suite and club suite service.

(e)

One or more on-premises retailer’s licenses, class C, may be issued to concessionaires or tenants of the DC Arena for suitable locations within the DC Arena, approved by the Board, where food and alcoholic beverages are served.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-233, § 202(b), 62 DCR 438
This section is referenced in § 25-1003.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-233 would have added “or the Soccer Stadium” twice in (a); would have added (c); would have added “the Soccer Stadium” in (d); and would have added “and the Soccer Stadium” in (e).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 202(b) of the Soccer Stadium Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-557, Dec. 30, 2014, 62 DCR 448, 20 STAT 4467).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-233: Section 301 of D.C. Law 20-233 provided (1) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (2) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (3) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.